North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 11. Outdoor Advertising Control Act.

§ 136-126.
Title of Article.

This Article may be cited as the Outdoor Advertising Control Act.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Illegal Billboards: Why the General Assembly Should Revise the Outdoor Advertising Control
Act to Comply with North Carolina Easement Law,” see 80 N.C.L. Rev. 2067 (2002).

§ 136-127.
Declaration of policy.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that outdoor advertising is a legitimate commercial use of private property adjacent to roads and highways but that the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising signs and devices in areas in the vicinity of the right-of-way of the interstate and primary highway systems within the State should be controlled and regulated in order to promote the safety, health, welfare and convenience and enjoyment of travel on and protection of the public investment in highways within the State, to prevent unreasonable distraction of operators of motor vehicles and to prevent interference with the effectiveness of traffic regulations and to promote safety on the highways, to attract tourists and promote the prosperity, economic well-being and general welfare of the State, and to preserve and enhance the natural scenic beauty of the highways and areas in the vicinity of the State highways and to promote the reasonable, orderly and effective display of such signs, displays and devices, and to secure the right of validly permitted outdoor advertising to be clearly viewed by the traveling public. It is the intention of the General Assembly to provide and declare herein a public policy and statutory basis for the regulation and control of outdoor advertising.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 2; 1999-404, s. 6; 2011-397, s. 9.

§ 136-128.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Erect” means to construct, build, raise, assemble, place, affix, attach, create, paint, draw, or in any other way bring into being or establish.

(1a)

“Illegal sign” means one which was erected and/or maintained in violation of State law.

(1b)

“Information center” means an area or site established and maintained at safety rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the State and providing such other information as the Department of Transportation may consider desirable.

“Interstate system” means that portion of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways located within the State, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the Department of Transportation, or other appropriate authorities and are also so designated by interstate numbers. As to highways under construction so designated as interstate highways pursuant to the above procedures, the highway shall be a part of the interstate system for the purposes of this Article on the date the location of the highway has been approved finally by the appropriate federal authorities.

(2a)

“Nonconforming sign” shall mean a sign which was lawfully erected but which does not comply with the provisions of State law or State rules and regulations passed at a later date or which later fails to comply with State law or State rules or regulations due to changed conditions. Illegally erected or maintained signs are not nonconforming signs.

“Outdoor advertising” means any outdoor sign, display, light, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, plaque, poster, billboard, or any other thing which is designed, intended or used to advertise or inform, any part of the advertising or information contents of which is visible from any place on the main-traveled way of the interstate or primary system, whether the same be permanent or portable installation.

“Primary systems” means the federal-aid primary system in existence on June 1, 1991, and any highway which is not on that system but which is on the National Highway System. As to highways under construction so designated as primary highways pursuant to the above procedures, the highway shall be a part of the primary system for purposes of this Article on the date the location of the highway has been approved finally by the appropriate federal or State authorities.

“Safety rest area” means an area or site established and maintained within or adjacent to the highway right-of-way by or under public supervision or control, for the convenience of the traveling public.

(5e)

“Sign not conforming to State standards” shall mean a sign which was legally erected but does not conform to the zoning, size, lighting, and spacing criteria established in rules and regulations of the Department authorized by this Article and promulgated at a later date, or a sign which was legally erected but later fails to conform to the zoning, size, lighting, and spacing criteria established in rules and regulations of the Department authorized by this Article.

“State law” means a State constitutional provision or statute, or an ordinance, rule or regulation enacted or adopted by a State agency or political subdivision of a State pursuant to a State Constitution or statute.

“Unzoned area” shall mean an area where there is no zoning in effect.

“Urban area” shall mean an area within the boundaries or limits of any incorporated municipality having a population of five thousand or more as determined by the latest available federal census.

“Visible” means capable of being seen (whether or not legible) without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 3; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, ss. 1-4; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1997-456, s. 27; 1999-404, s. 7; 2021-180, s. 41.47(a); 2021-189, s. 7.3.

§ 136-129.
Limitations of outdoor advertising devices.

No outdoor advertising shall be erected or maintained within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway systems in this State so as to be visible from the main-traveled way thereof after the effective date of this Article as determined by

G.S. 136-140

, except the following:

Directional and other official signs and notices, which signs and notices shall include those authorized and permitted by Chapter 136 of the General Statutes, which include but are not limited to official signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders, scenic and historic attractions and signs erected and maintained by a public utility, electric or telephone membership corporation, or municipality for the purpose of giving warning of or information as to the location of an underground cable, pipeline or other installation.

Outdoor advertising which advertises the sale or lease of property upon which it is located.

(2a)

Outdoor advertising to promote a bona fide farm that is exempt from zoning regulations pursuant to G.S. 153-340(b), provided the sign is no more than three feet long on any side and the sign is located on any bona fide farm property owned or leased by the owner or lessee of the bona fide farm.

Outdoor advertising which advertises activities conducted on the property upon which it is located.

Outdoor advertising, in conformity with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation, located in areas which are zoned industrial or commercial under authority of State law.

Outdoor advertising, in conformity with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation, located in unzoned commercial or industrial areas.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 4; 1972, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 946, s. 1; 1999-404, s. 8; 2020-18, s. 3.

Local Modification.

Buncombe and Surry: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 559, ss. 1, 2.

§ 136-129.1.
Limitations of outdoor advertising devices beyond 660 feet.

No outdoor advertising shall be erected or maintained beyond 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway systems in this State outside of the urban areas so as to be visible and intended to be read from the main-traveled way except the following:

Directional and other official signs and notices, which signs and notices shall include those authorized and permitted by Chapter 136 of the General Statutes, which include but are not limited to official signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders, scenic and historic attractions and signs erected and maintained by a public utility, electric or telephone membership corporation, or municipality for the purpose of giving warning of or information as to the location of an underground cable, pipeline or other installation.

Outdoor advertising which advertises the sale or lease of property upon which it is located.

Outdoor advertising which advertises activities conducted on the property upon which it is located.

History.

1975, c. 568, s. 6; 1999-404, s. 9.

§ 136-129.2.
Limitation of outdoor advertising devices adjacent to scenic highways, State and National Parks, historic areas and other places.

In addition to the limitations contained in

G.S. 136-129

and

G.S. 136-129

.1, in order to further the purposes set forth in Article 10 of this Chapter and to promote the reasonable, orderly, and effective display of outdoor advertising devices along highways adjacent to scenic and historical areas, while protecting the public investment in these highways and promoting the safety and recreational value of public travel, and to preserve natural beauty, no outdoor advertising sign shall be erected adjacent to any highway which is either:

A scenic highway or scenic byway designated by the Board of Transportation;

Within 1,200 feet, on the same side of the highway, of the boundary line of a North Carolina State Park, a National Park, a State or national wildlife refuge, or a designated wild and scenic river; or

Within 500 feet, on the same side of the highway, of the boundary lines of any historic districts and other properties listed in the National Register of Historic Places or State rest areas, or within the boundary lines of any historic district;

except as permitted under

G.S. 136-129(1)

, (2), (2a), or (3); or

Within one-third of the applicable distances under sub-subdivision (a)(1)b. and (a)(1)c. of this section, along the opposite side of the highway from any of the properties designated in sub-subdivision (a)(1)b. and (a)(1)c. of this section, except as permitted under

G.S. 136-129(1)

, (2), (2a), (3), (4), or (5).

The distances set forth in this section shall be measured horizontally in linear feet extending in each direction along the edge of the pavement of the highway from any point on the boundary of the subject property, or any point on the opposite side of the highway perpendicular to any point on the boundary line of the subject property.

As used in sub-subdivision (a)(1)b. and (a)(1)c. of this section, the term “highway” means a highway that is designated as a part of the interstate or federal-aid primary highway system as of June 1, 1991, or any highway which is or becomes a part of the National Highway System.

History.

1993, c. 524, s. 1.

§ 136-130.
Regulation of advertising.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in the form of ordinances governing:

The erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising permitted in

G.S. 136-129

,

The erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising permitted in

G.S. 136-129.1

,

(2a)

The erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising permitted in

G.S. 136-129.2

,

The specific requirements and procedures for obtaining a permit for outdoor advertising as required in

G.S. 136-133

and for the administrative procedures for appealing a decision at the agency level to refuse to grant or in revoking a permit previously issued, and

The administrative procedures for appealing a decision at the agency level to declare any outdoor advertising illegal and a nuisance as pursuant to

G.S. 136-134

, as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the State declared in this Article.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 5; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, s. 7; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 31; 1993, c. 524, s. 2.

§ 136-131.
Removal of existing nonconforming advertising.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or condemnation all outdoor advertising and all property rights pertaining thereto which are prohibited under the provisions of

G.S. 136-129

, 136-129.1 or 136-129.2, provided such outdoor advertising is in lawful existence on the effective date of this Article as determined by

G.S. 136-140

, or provided that it is lawfully erected after the effective date of this Article as determined by

G.S. 136-140

.

In any acquisition, purchase or condemnation, just compensation to the owner of the outdoor advertising, where the owner of the outdoor advertising does not own the fee, shall be limited to the fair market value at the time of the taking of the outdoor advertising owner’s interest in the real property on which the outdoor advertising is located and such value shall include the value of the outdoor advertising.

In any acquisition, purchase or condemnation, just compensation to the owner of the fee or other interest in the real property upon which the outdoor advertising is located where said owner does not own the outdoor advertising located thereon shall be limited to the difference in the fair market value of the entire tract immediately before and immediately after the taking by the Department of Transportation of the right to maintain such outdoor advertising thereon and in arriving at the fair market value after the taking, any special or general benefits accruing to the property by reason of the acquisition shall be taken into consideration.

In any acquisition, purchase or condemnation, just compensation to the owner of the fee in the real property upon which the outdoor advertising is located, where said owner also owns the outdoor advertising located thereon, shall be limited to the fair market value of the outdoor advertising plus the difference in the fair market value of the entire tract immediately before and immediately after the taking by the Department of Transportation of the right to maintain such outdoor advertising thereon and in arriving at the fair market value after the taking, any special or general benefits accruing to the property by reason of the acquisition shall be taken into consideration.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 6; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, ss. 8-10; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1993, c. 524, s. 3.

§ 136-131.1.
(See Editor’s note for expiration of section) Just compensation required for the removal of billboards on federal-aid primary highways by local authorities.

No municipality, county, local or regional zoning authority, or other political subdivision, shall, without the payment of just compensation in accordance with the provisions that are applicable to the Department of Transportation as provided in paragraphs 2, 3, and 4 of

G.S. 136-131

, remove or cause to be removed any outdoor advertising adjacent to a highway on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or a highway on the Federal-aid Primary Highway System for which there is in effect a valid permit issued by the Department of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of Article 11 of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1147, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 318, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1024, s. 1; 1989, c. 166, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 725, s. 1; 1998-23, s. 7; 1998-212, s. 27.5(a); 2002-11, s. 1.

§ 136-131.2.
Modernization of outdoor advertising devices.

No municipality, county, local or regional zoning authority, or other political subdivision shall, without the payment of just compensation as provided for in

G.S. 136-131.1

, regulate or prohibit the repair or reconstruction of any outdoor advertising for which there is in effect a valid permit issued by the Department of Transportation so long as the square footage of its advertising surface area is not increased. As used in this section, reconstruction includes the changing of an existing multipole outdoor advertising structure to a new monopole structure.

History.

2013-413, s. 8(b); 2014-115, s. 17.

§ 136-131.5.
Relocation of lawfully existing outdoor advertising sign.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, in order to minimize the amount of just compensation due, whenever property on which a lawfully erected outdoor advertising sign is located is acquired by a public or private condemnor, as defined in

G.S. 40A-3

, or the Department of Transportation, and the acquiring party requires removal of the sign, or whenever the construction of a sound barrier wall would impair the visibility of a lawfully erected outdoor advertising sign, the eligible sign is permitted to be relocated and reconstructed, subject to all of the following requirements:

The new site for relocation is permitted to be any area within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of a highway on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or the federal aid primary highway system within the same zoning jurisdiction as the relocated site or, if the relocated site is within an unzoned city or county, then within the same territorial limits.

The new site for relocation must be conforming to State standards as set forth in this Article and pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the Department as authorized by this Article.

The new site for relocation must be along a highway on the interstate system or primary systems that has the same route number and letter or one of the same route numbers and letters as the highway adjacent to the relocated site.

The reconstruction of the outdoor advertising sign at the new site shall comply with

G.S. 136-131.2

.

The new site for relocation shall not be within an historic district lawfully established by a local city or county government pursuant to Part 4 of Article 9 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, unless consented to by a resolution adopted by the applicable local governing board.

The new site for relocation shall not be adjacent to any scenic highway as provided in

G.S. 136-129.2

; provided, however, if a relocated sign is already adjacent to a scenic highway, it may be relocated within the same parcel.

The construction work related to the relocation of the outdoor advertising sign shall commence within one year after the date of removal.The express allowances of relocation and reconstruction in this section shall apply to any lawfully erected outdoor advertising sign anywhere within this State that is required to be removed as a result of action taken by a public or private condemnor, as defined in

G.S. 40A-3

, or the Department of Transportation, including such signs that are not subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, any outdoor advertising sign that does not otherwise qualify for relocation as provided in subsection (a) of this section and for which there is in effect a valid permit issued by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this Article is permitted to be relocated and reconstructed subject to all of the requirements listed in subdivisions (1) through (7) of subsection (a) of this section within the same parcel or an adjoining conforming parcel. No sign shall be relocated pursuant to this subsection within 10 years from the date of the last relocation pursuant to this subsection, however, this temporal limitation does not apply to relocations within the same parcel.

A sign not conforming to State standards shall not be relocated pursuant to this section unless the nonconformity is removed as part of the relocation.

The Department shall not require additional permits, nor revoke any existing permits, for any action taken pursuant to this section. The Department may require within 30 days of the completion of any action taken pursuant to this section an addendum to an existing permit showing or describing the changes to the conditions of the outdoor advertising sign. The rights set forth in this section shall attach to a permit issued by the Department of Transportation and shall expire with the voluntary cancellation of such permit or after the permit has been lawfully revoked and any appeals pursuant to

G.S. 136-134.1

have been exhausted. The rights set forth in this section do not run with or attach to the land.

History.

2021-180, s. 41.47(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 41.47(c), made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 41.47(b), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to signs legally erected or that require removal on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 136-132.
Condemnation procedure.

For the purpose of this Article, the Department of Transportation shall use the procedure for condemnation of real property as provided by Article 9 of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 7; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-133.
Permits required.

No person shall erect or maintain any outdoor advertising within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway system, except those allowed under

G.S. 136-129

, subdivisions (2) and (3) in this Article, or beyond 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway system, except those allowed under

G.S. 136-129.1

, subdivisions (2) and (3), without first obtaining a permit from the Department of Transportation or its agents pursuant to the procedures set out by rules adopted by the Department of Transportation. The permit shall be valid until revoked for nonconformance with this Article or rules adopted by the Department of Transportation. Any person aggrieved by the decision of the Department of Transportation or its agents in refusing to grant or in revoking a permit may appeal the decision in accordance with the rules adopted by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this Article to the Secretary of Transportation who shall make the final decision on the agency appeal. The Department of Transportation shall have the authority to charge permit fees to defray the costs of administering the permit procedures under this Article. The fees for directional signs as set forth in

G.S. 136-129(1)

and

G.S. 136-129.1(1)

shall not exceed a forty dollar ($40.00) initial fee and a thirty dollar ($30.00) annual renewal fee. The fees for outdoor advertising structures, as set forth in

G.S. 136-129(4)

and (5) shall not exceed a one hundred twenty dollar ($120.00) initial fee and a sixty dollar ($60.00) annual renewal fee.

If outdoor advertising is under construction and the Department of Transportation determines that a permit has not been issued for the outdoor advertising, the Department may require that all work on the outdoor advertising cease until the owner of the outdoor advertising shows that the outdoor advertising does not violate this section. The stopwork order shall be prominently posted on the outdoor advertising structure, and no further notice of the stopwork order is required. The failure of an owner of outdoor advertising to comply immediately with the stopwork order shall subject the outdoor advertising to removal by the Department of Transportation or its agents. Outdoor advertising is under construction when it is in any phase of construction prior to the attachment and display of the advertising message in final position for viewing by the traveling public. The cost of removing outdoor advertising by the Department of Transportation or its agents pursuant to this section shall be assessed against the owner of the unpermitted outdoor advertising by the Department of Transportation. No stopwork order may be issued when the Department of Transportation process agent has been served with a court order allowing the sign to be constructed.

No electrical permit shall be denied to an outdoor advertising sign described in

G.S. 136-129(4)

and

G.S. 136-129(5)

for which the Department has issued a permit which has not been revoked, and the electrical permit is otherwise compliant with technical utility standards.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 8; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, s. 11; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 32; 1983, c. 604, s. 2; 1989, c. 677; 1999-404, s. 1; 2011-397, s. 3.

§ 136-133.1.
Outdoor advertising vegetation cutting or removal.

The owner of an outdoor advertising sign permitted under

G.S. 136-129(a)(4)

[G.S. 136-129(4)] or

G.S. 136-129(a)(5)

[G.S. 136-129(5)] who obtains a selective vegetation removal permit, and the owner’s designees, may cut, thin, prune, or remove vegetation in accordance with this section, G.S. 136-93(b), 136-133.2, and 136-133.4. The maximum cut or removal zone for vegetation for each sign face shall be determined as follows:

The point located on the edge of the right-of-way that is the closest point to the centerline of the sign face shall be point A.

The point located 200 feet down the right-of-way line in the direction of the sign viewing zone shall be point B.

The point on the edge of the pavement of the travel way, including acceleration and deceleration ramps, that is the closest to the centerline of the sign shall be point C.

The point 50 feet down the edge of the pavement in the direction of the sign viewing zone from point C shall be point D.

The point 380 feet down the edge of the pavement in the direction of the sign viewing zone from point C shall be point E; provided, however, the following shall apply within the corporal limits and territorial jurisdiction of any city, as defined in Chapter 160A of the General Statutes:

On interstates or other routes with fully controlled access, the point 340 feet down the edge of the pavement in the direction of the sign viewing zone from point C shall be point E.

On highways other than interstates and other routes with fully controlled access, the point 250 feet down the edge of the pavement in the direction of the sign viewing zone from point C shall be point E.

Lines drawn from point A to point D and from point B to point E shall define the limits of the vegetation cut or removal area.

(a1)

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in order to promote the outdoor advertiser’s right to be clearly viewed as set forth in

G.S. 136-127

, the Department of Transportation, at the request of a selective vegetation removal permittee, may approve plans for the cutting, thinning, pruning, or removal of vegetation outside of the cut or removal zone defined in subsection (a) of this section along acceleration or deceleration ramps so long as the view to the outdoor advertising sign will be improved and the total aggregate area of cutting or removal does not exceed the maximum allowed in subsection (a) of this section.

Vegetation permitted to be cut, thinned, pruned, or removed shall be defined as any tree, shrub, or underbrush within the zone created by points A, B, D, and E. Any existing tree that was in existence at the time that an outdoor advertising structure was erected shall only be eligible for removal in accordance with subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section. Native dogwoods and native redbuds shall be preserved. For the purposes of this section, an existing tree is defined as a tree that had a diameter of four inches or greater as measured six inches from the ground at the time that the outdoor advertising structure was erected. An outdoor advertising sign is considered erected when the sign is completely constructed with a sign face.

The applicant for a selective vegetation removal permit shall submit to the Department a site plan locating thereon any trees existing at the time that the outdoor advertising sign was erected, as defined in subsection (b) of this section, that are requested to be cut, thinned, pruned, or removed, and noting their species and total caliper inches. The applicant shall also tag, with highly visible material or flagging, any tree that is, at the time of the application for a selective vegetation removal permit, greater than four inches in diameter as measured six inches from the ground and requested to be cut, thinned, pruned, or removed. The selective vegetation removal request may be investigated on-site by Department personnel and a representative of the applicant. In the event that the Department disputes the accuracy of the existing tree information on the site plan noted above, the Department shall notify the applicant in writing and may request the following:

A tree survey.

That the applicant amends the site plan.

That the applicant deletes the trees in dispute from the desired cutting.If a notice of disputed tree information is received from the Department, the applicant can either employ the services of a North Carolina licensed landscape architect or certified arborist to perform a tree survey, amend the site plan, or notify the Department in writing that any or all of the disputed trees are deleted from the application. If the applicant selects a tree survey, the landscape architect or certified arborist will submit a report under seal that contains a tree inventory of existing trees in the removal zone for the outdoor advertising structure and include the age of any tree that existed at the time that the sign was erected. The report will categorize tree species and include a site map of sufficient detail and dimensions. A tree survey will not be required for subsequent applications to cut, thin, prune, or remove trees at the same site for trees that have been previously permitted. Any dispute relating to whether or not the tree existed at the time the outdoor advertising sign was erected shall be conclusively resolved by information in the report from the licensed landscape architect or certified arborist.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, trees existing at the time the outdoor advertising sign was erected may only be removed within the zone created in subsection (a) of this section if the applicant satisfies one of the following two options selected by the applicant: (i) reimbursement to the Department pursuant to

G.S. 136-93.2

or (ii) trees that existed at the time of the erection of the sign may be removed if the applicant agrees to remove two nonconforming outdoor advertising signs for each sign at which removal of existing trees is requested. The surrendered nonconforming signs must be fully disassembled before any removal of existing trees is permitted and shall not be eligible for future outdoor advertising permits in perpetuity.

Removal of trees and vegetation of any age, including complete removal, except for native dogwoods and native redbuds, shall be permitted within the cut or removal zone established in subsection (a) of this section if the applicant for the selective vegetation removal permit, in lieu of compliance with subsection (d) of this section, agrees to submit to the Department a plan for beautification and replanting related to the site for which the vegetation permit request is made. The Department shall develop rules for compensatory replanting, including the criteria for determining which sites qualify for replanting, and shall, in consultation with the applicant and local government representatives, determine which sites must be replanted, and the types of plants and trees to be replanted. The replanting and maintenance shall be conducted by the applicant or his or her agents in accordance with the rules adopted by the Department. If the conditions detailed in this subsection are agreed to by the applicant and approved by the Department, there shall be no reimbursement to the Department under

G.S. 136-93.2

for removal of trees that existed at the time the outdoor sign was erected, nor shall the applicant be required to remove two nonconforming outdoor advertising signs for removal of existing trees at the site.

Tree branches within a highway right-of-way that encroach into the zone created by points A, B, D, and E may be cut or pruned. Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, no person, firm, or entity shall cut, trim, prune, or remove or otherwise cause to be cut, trimmed, pruned, or removed vegetation that is in front of, or adjacent to, outdoor advertising and within the limits of the highway right-of-way for the purpose of enhancing the visibility of outdoor advertising unless permitted to do so by the Department in accordance with this section, G.S. 136-93(b), 136-133.2, and 136-133.4.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the owner of an outdoor advertising sign defined by subsection (a) of this section or the owner’s designees may, working only from the private property side of the fence, without charge and without obtaining a selective vegetation removal permit, cut, trim, prune, or remove any tree or other vegetation except for native dogwoods or native redbuds that is (i) less than four inches in diameter at the height of the controlled access fence, (ii) located within 200 feet on either side of the existing sign location as defined by point A and point B in G.S. 136-133.1(a)(1) and (2), and (iii) a distance of three feet from a controlled access fence within the limits of the highway right-of-way. The activities permitted by this subsection must be performed from the private property owner side of the controlled access fence and with the consent of the owner of the land that is used to access said fence.

No additional funds from the Highway Trust Fund shall be used for the purpose of vegetation replacement under the provisions of this section.

The Department may revoke an outdoor advertising permit for the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting of vegetation within the right-of-way of any State-owned or State-maintained highway only if both of the following conditions are met:

The unlawful destruction or illegal cutting occurred within 500 feet of either side of the corresponding sign location measured along the edge of pavement of the main travel way of the nearest controlled route and was willfully caused by one or more of the following:

The sign owner.

The permit holder.

The lessee or advertiser employing the sign.

Any employees, agents, or assigns of persons listed in sub-subdivisions a. through c. of this subdivision, including, but not limited to, independent contractors hired by any of the above persons, or the owner of the property upon which the sign is located, if expressly authorized by the above persons to use or maintain the sign.

There is substantial, material evidence that the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting of vegetation would create, increase, or improve a view to the outdoor advertising sign for passing motorists from the main travel way of the nearest controlled route.

History.

2011-397, s. 4; 2013-413, s. 8(a); 2014-115, s. 7.

§ 136-133.2.
Issuance or denial of a selective vegetation removal permit.

Except as provided in G.S. 136-133.1(g), permits to remove vegetation may be granted for outdoor advertising locations that have been permitted for at least two years prior to the date of application. The Department shall approve or deny an application submitted pursuant to this section, including the fee required by

G.S. 136-18.7

and all required documentation, within 30 days of the receipt of an application for a selective vegetation removal permit. If written notice of approval or denial is not given to the applicant within the 30-day period, then the application shall be deemed approved. If the application is denied, the Department shall advise the applicant, in writing, by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the party to be noticed, and delivering to the addressee, the reasons for the denial.

History.

2011-397, s. 5.

§ 136-133.3.
Appeals of selective vegetation removal permit decisions.

An applicant for a selective vegetation removal permit issued pursuant to

G.S. 136-133.2

may appeal a decision of the Department pertaining to the denial or conditioning of a permit for selective vegetation removal pursuant to the provisions of this section.

Within 30 days of service of the Department’s decision to deny or condition a selective vegetation removal permit issued pursuant to

G.S. 136-133.4

, the applicant shall submit a written appeal to the Secretary of Transportation setting forth with particularity the facts and arguments upon which the appeal is based. The appeal shall be sent to the Secretary by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the Secretary, and delivering to the addressee, with a copy to the Department official who issued the decision.

Upon receipt of the written appeal, the Secretary of Transportation shall review the written appeal and the Department’s decision, as well as any available documents, exhibits, or other evidence bearing on the appeal, and shall render the agency’s final decision, supported by findings of fact and conclusions of law. The final agency decision shall be served upon the appealing party by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the applicant, and delivering to the addressee, within 90 days after the Secretary receives the written appeal. A copy of the agency’s final decision shall also be delivered to the Department official who issued the initial decision.

A person aggrieved by a decision made pursuant to this section may seek judicial review of the final agency decision pursuant to

G.S. 136-134.1

.

History.

2011-397, s. 6.